Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB694.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 15(a) of the act of April 23, 1956 (1955 P.L.1510, No.500), known as the Disease Prevention and Control Law of 1955, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 15. Confidentiality of Reports and Records.--(a) Except as provided under section 15.1, State and local health authorities may not disclose reports of diseases, any records maintained as a result of any action taken in consequence of such reports, or any other records maintained pursuant to this act or any regulations, to any person who is not a member of the department or of a local board or department 12345678910111213141516171819202122 of health, except as follows:* * *(3) Where the department receives a resolution from the governing body of a county without a local board or department of health that authorizes the governing body of the county to receive communicable disease or reportable disease information that occurs within its jurisdiction. Upon receipt of the resolution under this clause, the department shall release to the governing body of the county de-identifying communicable disease or reportable disease information, including the municipality where there has been a confirmed case of a communicable disease or reportable disease within the past twenty-four (24) hours. The governing body of the county shall comply with all applicable Federal and State laws, regulations and confidentiality standards regarding the use of communicable disease or reportable disease information under this clause. This clause shall not apply to the release of communicable disease or reportable disease information of a municipality with a local board or department of health.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250HB0694PN0710 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021